Hawaii statutes.
§145D-1 Definitions. Whenever used in
this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

"Charitable, religious, or nonprofit
organization" means any organization which was organized and is operating
in the State for charitable or religious purposes or to promote social welfare,
which is exempt from income taxation under chapter 235, and which distributes
food products at no cost to needy persons.

"Donor" means any person,
partnership, corporation, company, or association engaged in the farming, processing,
distribution, wholesaling, or retailing of food products who donates such
products, without remuneration, to a charitable, religious, or nonprofit
organization.

"Food product" means any fowl,
seafood, animal, vegetable, or other stuff, product, or article which is
customary food fit for human consumption, including prepared, canned, milk,
dairy, and farm products, before or after the expiration date stamped on the
products, if any.

"Needy person" means any person who
lacks adequate or proper means of subsistence. [L 1982, c 260, pt of §2; am L
1990, c 55, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next